Nevada, session 83, AB261.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a registered voter is contacted by a county clerk pursuant
to NRS 293.269927 because there is a reasonable question of fact
as to whether the signature used for the mail ballot matches the
signature of the registered voter that is available in the records of
the county clerk, the county clerk shall, in addition to the
requirements set forth in NRS 293.269927, affirmatively ask
whether the registered voter would like to update his or her
signature in the records of the county clerk. Unless the voter
affirmatively declines to update his or her signature in the records
of the county clerk:
-
*AB261*

– 3 –
(a) It shall be deemed that the voter consented to update his or
her signature; and
(b) Any signature provided pursuant to NRS 293.269927 by the
registered voter to the county clerk becomes the voter’s signature
for purposes of his or her voter registration.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.530 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.541:
(a) County clerks may use any reliable and reasonable means
available to correct the portions of the statewide voter registration
list which are relevant to the county clerks and to determine whether
a registered voter’s current residence is other than that indicated on
the voter’s application to register to vote.
(b) A county clerk may, with the consent of the board of county
commissioners, make investigations of registration in the county by
census, by house-to-house canvass or by any other method.
(c) A county clerk shall cancel the registration of a voter
pursuant to this subsection if:
(1) The county clerk mails a written notice to the voter which
the United States Postal Service is required to forward;
(2) The county clerk mails a return postcard with the notice
which has a place for the voter to write his or her new address, is
addressed to the county clerk and has postage guaranteed;
(3) The voter does not respond;
(4) The voter’s registration information has not been updated
by an automatic voter registration agency pursuant to NRS 293.5768
to 293.57699, inclusive; and
(5) The voter does not appear to vote in an election before
the polls have closed in the second general election following the
date of the notice.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, the date of the notice is
deemed to be 3 days after it is mailed.
(e) The county clerk shall maintain records of:
(1) Any notice mailed pursuant to paragraph (c);
(2) Any response to such notice; and
(3) Whether a person to whom a notice is mailed appears to
vote in an election,
 for not less than 2 years after creation.
(f) The county clerk shall use any postcards which are returned
to correct the portions of the statewide voter registration list which
are relevant to the county clerk.
(g) If a voter fails to return the postcard mailed pursuant to
paragraph (c) within 30 days, the county clerk shall designate the
voter as inactive on the voter’s application to register to vote.
-
*AB261*

– 4 –
(h) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to prescribe
the method for maintaining a list of voters who have been
designated as inactive pursuant to paragraph (g).
[(i) If:
(1) The name of a voter is added to the statewide voter
registration list pursuant to NRS 293.57693; or
(2) The voter registration information of a voter whose name
is on the statewide voter registration list is updated pursuant to
NRS 293.5752,
 the county clerk shall provide written notice of the addition or
change to the voter not later than 5 working days after the addition
or change is made. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph,
the notice must be mailed to the current residence of the voter. The
county clerk may send the notice by electronic mail if the voter
confirms the validity of the electronic mail address to which the
notice will be sent by responding to a confirmation inquiry sent to
that electronic mail address. Such a confirmation inquiry must be
sent for each notice sent pursuant to this paragraph. The notice
required pursuant to this paragraph may be provided as part of the
notice mailed pursuant to NRS 293.57693.]
2. A county clerk is not required to take any action pursuant to
this section in relation to a person who preregisters to vote until the
person is deemed to be registered to vote pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 293.4855.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.57691 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.57691 1. A county clerk shall not reject as an application
to register to vote the information received from an automatic voter
registration agency solely on the basis that the information does not
contain an electronic facsimile of the signature of the person who is
applying to vote or update his or her voter registration information
on the statewide voter registration list.
2. If the county clerk does not receive an electronic facsimile
of the signature of the person from the automatic voter registration
agency, the county clerk must obtain the person’s signature or an
electronic facsimile of the person’s signature through one of the
following methods:
(a) Through the notice provided by the [county clerk] Secretary
of State to the person pursuant to NRS 293.57693, if the notice is
returned to the county clerk by the person and the returned notice
includes the person’s signature;
(b) Requesting an electronic facsimile of the person’s signature
from the Department of Motor Vehicles or another state agency;
(c) Requesting the person to submit an electronic facsimile of
the person’s signature through a method approved by the Secretary
of State; or
-
*AB261*

– 5 –
(d) Requesting the person to sign a paper or electronic form the
first time the person applies to vote in person at a polling place,
including, without limitation, a polling place for early voting by
personal appearance. A signature provided by a person pursuant to
this paragraph must be compared to one of the forms of
identification which may be used individually to identify a voter at
the polling place set forth in NRS 293.277 before the person is
allowed to vote in person.
3. In addition to the requirements of this section and NRS
293.2725, a person who is registered to vote pursuant to NRS
293.5768 to 293.57699, inclusive, must provide an affirmation
signed under penalty of perjury that the person is eligible to vote the
first time a person votes in person or by mail ballot if the person has
not already provided such an affirmation to the county clerk.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.57693 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.57693 1. Upon transmission of the information to the
database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.675
by an automatic voter registration agency, the county clerk shall
collate the information into an individual electronic document,
which shall be deemed an application to register to vote. The county
clerk shall review the voter registration information transmitted by
the automatic voter registration agency to determine whether the
person is eligible to register to vote in this State.
2. If the county clerk determines that a person is eligible to
vote [, the] :
(a) The person shall be deemed a registered voter [.] ;
(b) The county clerk shall immediately notify the Secretary of
State that the person is eligible to vote;
(c) The person’s name must appear on the statewide voter
registration list and the appropriate roster ; and [the]
(d) The person must be provided all sample ballots and other
voter information provided to registered voters.
3. [In addition to the requirements of subsection 2,] Upon
notification by the county clerk that a person is eligible to vote, the
Secretary of State shall immediately mail a notice to the current
residence of the person. The notice must be in the form prescribed
by the Secretary of State and include, without limitation:
(a) A space for the person to indicate a political party affiliation;
(b) A space for the person to affirmatively decline to apply to
register to vote or have his or her voter registration updated, as
applicable;
(c) A preaddressed return envelope with the address of the
appropriate county clerk and postage prepaid;
(d) A statement setting forth the qualifications to vote in this
State as provided by NRS 293.485 and that if the person does not
-
*AB261*

– 6 –
meet the qualifications to vote in this State, the person should return
the notice and affirmatively decline in writing to register to vote;
(e) A statement explaining that unless the person affirmatively
declines in writing to apply to register to vote or have his or her
voter registration information updated, as applicable, the person is
deemed to have consented to the transmission of information to the
database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.675
by the automatic voter registration agency for the purpose of
registering the person to vote or updating the voter registration
information on the statewide voter registration list;
(f) A statement explaining that if the person affirmatively
declines in writing to apply to register to vote or to have his or her
voter registration information updated, as applicable, the county
clerk will remove the person from the statewide voter registration
list or revert the person’s information on the statewide voter
registration list to the information that was on the statewide voter
registration list before the automatic voter registration agency
transmitted the information, and the person shall be deemed to not
have registered to vote or updated his or her voter registration
information, as applicable;
(g) A statement setting forth the penalties for submitting a false
application to register to vote; and
(h) A statement that:
(1) Indicates a political party affiliation or indicates that the
person is not affiliated with a political party is voluntary;
(2) The person may indicate a political party affiliation on
the form provided by the [county clerk] Secretary of State in the
notice; and
(3) The person will not be able to vote at a primary election,
presidential preference primary election or primary city election for
candidates for partisan offices of a major political party unless the
person updates his or her voter registration information to indicate a
major political party affiliation.
4. The [county clerk] Secretary of State may send the notice
required pursuant to subsection 3 by electronic mail if the person
confirms the validity of the electronic mail address to which the
notice will be sent by responding a confirmation inquiry sent to that
electronic mail address.
5. The failure or refusal of the person to acknowledge that he
or she has received the notice required by subsection 3 is not a
declination by the person to apply to register to vote or have his or
her voter registration information updated.
6. If the county clerk determines that a person is not eligible to
register to vote or if the voter affirmatively declines in writing to be
-
*AB261*

– 7 –
registered to vote or have his or her automatic voter registration
updated:
(a) It shall be deemed that the transmittal from the automatic
voter registration agency is not a completed voter registration
application;
(b) It shall be deemed that the person did not apply to register to
vote;
(c) It shall be deemed that the transmission of the person’s
information by the automatic voter registration system was an
official authorized act;
(d) It shall be deemed that the person did not falsely claim
citizenship in order to register to vote unless the person
affirmatively claimed to be a citizen to the automatic voter
registration agency; and
(e) The county clerk must remove the person’s registration from
the database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.675 or revert the person’s information on the database to the
information that was on the database before the automatic voter
registration agency transmitted the information to the county clerk,
as applicable.
Sec. 5. Chapter 293C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a registered voter is contacted by a city clerk pursuant to
NRS 293C.26327 because there is a reasonable question of fact as
to whether the signature used for the mail ballot matches the
signature of the registered voter that is available in the records of
the city clerk, the city clerk shall, in addition to the requirements
set forth in NRS 293C.26327, affirmatively ask whether the
registered voter would like to update his or her signature in the
records of the city clerk. Unless the voter affirmatively declines to
update his or her signature in the records of the city clerk:
(a) It shall be deemed that the voter consented to update his or
her signature; and
(b) Any signature provided pursuant to NRS 293C.26327 by
the registered voter to the city clerk becomes the voter’s signature
for purposes of his or her voter registration.
2. The Secretary of State may adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 6. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and section 6 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
-
*AB261*

– 8 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB261*